Nevada, session 83, AB477.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 209.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.131 The Director shall:
1. Administer the Department under the direction of the Board.
2. Supervise the administration of all institutions and facilities
of the Department.
3. Receive, retain and release, in accordance with law,
offenders sentenced to imprisonment in the state prison.
4. Be responsible for the supervision, custody, treatment, care,
security and discipline of all offenders under his or her jurisdiction.
5. Ensure that any person employed by the Department whose
primary responsibilities are:
(a) The supervision, custody, security, discipline, safety and
transportation of an offender;
(b) The security and safety of the staff; and
(c) The security and safety of an institution or facility of the
Department,
 is a correctional officer who has the powers of a peace officer
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 289.220.
6. Establish regulations with the approval of the Board and
enforce all laws governing the administration of the Department and
the custody, care and training of offenders.
7. Take proper measures to protect the health and safety of the
staff and offenders in the institutions and facilities of the
Department.
8. Take proper measures to protect the health and safety of
persons employed by a school district to operate a program of
education for incarcerated persons in an institution or facility
pursuant to chapter 388H of NRS.
9. Cause to be placed from time to time in conspicuous places
about each institution and facility copies of laws and regulations
relating to visits and correspondence between offenders and others.
10. Provide for the holding of religious services in the
institutions and facilities and make available to the offenders copies
of appropriate religious materials.
11. [Compile the] Collect and maintain an electronic record
for each offender in a facility or institution of the Department,
which must include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) The last known residential address of each offender
immediately before the offender was sentenced to imprisonment in a
facility or institution of the Department [.] ;
(b) Whether the offender is 18 years of age or older; and
(c) The race or ethnicity of the offender, which must include a
separate category for persons of Hispanic or Latino descent.
Sec. 2. NRS 360.288 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.288 1. [Upon the completion] The Department of
Corrections shall, after April 1 but not later than July 1 of each
year in which the national decennial census is completed, furnish
to the State Demographer for every inmate in a facility or
institution of the Department:
(a) A unique identifying number, which may not include the
name of the inmate and must be different than any other
identification number assigned to the inmate by the Department;
(b) The street address of the facility or institution in which the
inmate is sentenced to imprisonment;
(c) The last known residential address of each inmate
immediately before the inmate was sentenced to imprisonment in a
facility or institution of the Department and any alternative
residential address of the inmate, if known by the Department;
(d) Whether the inmate is 18 years of age or older; and
(e) The race or ethnicity of the person, which must include a
separate category for persons of Hispanic or Latino descent.
2. Not later than 30 days after provision of the [national
decennial census conducted] redistricting data by the Bureau of the
Census of the United States Department of Commerce [,] to the
State pursuant to Public Law 94-171, the State Demographer shall ,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, revise the population
counts for every block, block group and census tract as set forth in
the census to count every inmate who was a resident of the State
before incarceration in the block, block group and census tract of
which an inmate was a resident before his or her incarceration [.
2. The Department of Corrections shall, upon request, provide
to] based on the information received from the Department of
Corrections pursuant to subsection 1.
3. For every inmate whose information is received pursuant
to subsection 1 for whom the last known residential address is
unknown or whose last known residential address was not in this
State, and for every inmate in a federal facility or institution for
whom the last known residential address is unknown, the State
Demographer [all available information requested by the State
Demographer in carrying out the provisions of subsection 1.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
3.] :
(a) Must not count the inmate in the block, block group and
census tract of the facility or institution in which the inmate is
incarcerated; and
(b) Must count the inmate as a resident of a state unit not tied
to a specific block, block group, census tract or other geographical
unit.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Block” means the smallest geographical unit whose
boundaries were designated by the Bureau of the Census of the
United States Department of Commerce in its topographically
integrated geographic encoding and referencing system.
(b) “Block group” means a combination of blocks whose
numbers begin with the same digit.
(c) “Census tract” means a combination of block groups.
(d) “Inmate” means a person who was determined to be
incarcerated in a facility or institution of the Department of
Corrections at the last preceding national decennial census
conducted by the Bureau of the Census of the United States
Department of Commerce.
(e) “State Demographer” means the demographer employed by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to NRS 360.283.
Sec. 3. The Director of the Department of Corrections shall,
before January 1, 2026, collect and maintain for each offender in a
facility or institution of the Department who will be released from
the facility or institution after July 1, 2030, the last known
residential address of the offender immediately before the offender
was sentenced to imprisonment in a facility or institution of the
Department.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 2 and 3 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)